Virginia statutes. Title 30. General Assembly.
Chapter 50. Autism Advisory Council.

§§
30-326–30-329.
(Expired) Autism Advisory Council created; purpose; membership; staff; Powers and duties of the Council; Autism spectrum disorders defined.

Editor’s note.

Former §§ 30-326 through 30-329 which established the Autism Advisory Council, were enacted by Acts 2011, c. 752; amended by Acts 2014, cc. 496, 537; 2016, c. 106; 2018, c. 719; 2020, c. 733; and expired July 1, 2022, by the terms of Acts 2020, c. 733.